Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.450

Receivership—Appointment of receiver.

Upon agreement of the candidate for receiver to the terms of the receivership and any special instructions of the court, the court may appoint that person as receiver of the nursing home if the court determines it is likely that a permanent operator will be found or conditions will be corrected without undue risk of harm to the patients. Appointment of a receiver may be in lieu of or in addition to temporary removal of some or all of the patients in the interests of their health, security, or welfare. A receiver shall be appointed for a term not to exceed six months, but a term may be extended for good cause shown.

[ 1987 c 476 s 14.]